Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Chapter 04. Oil and Hazardous Substance Pollution Control.

Cross references. —

For other provisions related to violations of this chapter, see AS 46.03; for other provisions related to oil pollution control, see AS 46.08 (Oil and Hazardous Substance Releases).

Administrative Code. —

For oil and other hazardous substances pollution control, see 18 AAC 75.

Collateral references. —

61C Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, §§ 950-1031.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 160 et seq.

Duty and liability as to plugging oil or gas well abandoned or taken out of production. 50 ALR3d 240.

Liability of oil and gas lessee or operator for injuries to or death of livestock. 51 ALR3d 304.